Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201571-2512
Violations; penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of the Poison Control Act, except as specific penalties are otherwise imposed, is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Any person, for a second or subsequent violation of any of the provisions of the Poison Control Act, when another specific penalty is not expressly imposed, is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1941, c. 141, § 17, p. 567;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-935;

R.S.1943, § 81-636;

Laws 1972, LB 1067, § 3;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 167;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 131;

Laws 1988, LB 1012, § 12;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 88.
August 30, 2015